Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.260

Applicability of administrative procedure act.

The administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall wherever applicable herein govern the rights, remedies, and procedures respecting the administration of this chapter.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 26.]